Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2330
Center; duties.

The center shall:

(1) Maintain adequate records documenting compliance with
the requirements of the One-Call Notification System Act, including records
of all telephone calls and records of all locate requests for the preceding
five years which will be made available and printed upon request of an operator
or excavator;

(2) Provide the notification service during normal working
hours at a minimum; and

(3) Provide procedures for emergency notification for calls
received at other than normal working hours.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 30;

Laws 2014, LB736, § 2.